Massachusetts, session 194th, H5461.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the
licensing authority of the town ofWeston may grant an additional license for the sale of all
alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 12 of said chapter 138 to
Weston Breakfast, LLC, located at the premises known as 31 Center Street in the town of
Weston. The license shall be subject to all of said chapter 138 except said section 17.
(b) A license granted pursuant to this section shall only be exercised in the dining room
of a common victualler and such other public rooms or areas as may be deemed reasonable and
appropriate by the licensing authority as certified in writing.
(c) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of a license granted pursuant to
this section to any other location, but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same
of 2

location if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue
and a letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in
good standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have
been paid.
(d) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew the license granted pursuant to this section or
any such license is cancelled, revoked, or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with
all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority
which may, within 3 years of such return, then grant the license to a new applicant at the same
location and under the same conditions as specified in this section, otherwise such license shall
dissolve.
(e) The license granted pursuant to this section shall be issued within 2 years after the
effective date of this act; provided, however, that a license that is originally granted within that
time period, it may be granted to a new applicant pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) thereafter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2